Contents/Resources/Wolfram Player.app/Contents/SystemFiles/Components/SpellingData/SpellingDictionaries/de_DE.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1510 Y 1
SFX 1510 0 tatt .
SFX 191 Y 1
SFX 191 0 analysen .
SFX 2783 Y 1
SFX 2783 0 differenz .
SFX 1261 Y 1
SFX 1261 0 besuch .
SFX 3871 Y 1
SFX 3871 0 atmosphären .
SFX 3943 Y 1
SFX 3943 0 öffnungen .
SFX 573 Y 1
SFX 573 0 ordnung .
SFX 1997 Y 1
SFX 1997 0 richtung .
SFX 2900 Y 1
SFX 2900 0 nhaus .
SFX 3428 Y 1
SFX 3428 0 auftritt .
SFX 1531 Y 1
SFX 1531 0 farben .
SFX 4000 Y 1
SFX 4000 0 anschlüssen .
SFX 179 Y 1
SFX 179 0 analyse .
SFX 895 Y 1
SFX 895 0 experte .
SFX 832 Y 1
SFX 832 0 sbetriebe .
SFX 711 Y 1
SFX 711 0 sbetriebs .
SFX 1387 Y 1
SFX 1387 0 inheit .
SFX 4176 Y 1
SFX 4176 0 maße .
SFX 859 Y 1
SFX 859 0 abbau .
SFX 2400 Y 1
SFX 2400 0 nnetz .
SFX 547 Y 1
SFX 547 0 zahlen .
SFX 986 Y 1
SFX 986 0 eigenschaft .
SFX 2969 Y 1
SFX 2969 0 sabsichten .
SFX 4349 Y 1
SFX 4349 0 chmucks .
SFX 1123 Y 1
SFX 1123 0 managements .
SFX 1607 Y 1
SFX 1607 0 entscheidungen .
SFX 162 Y 1
SFX 162 0 häuser .
SFX 2989 Y 1
SFX 2989 0 idee .
SFX 4508 Y 1
SFX 4508 0 diebstahl .
SFX 4219 Y 1
SFX 4219 0 anleitungen .
SFX 22 Y 1
SFX 22 0 nde .
SFX 2902 Y 1
SFX 2902 0 ngesetz .
SFX 1869 Y 1
SFX 1869 0 hütten .
SFX 3285 Y 1
SFX 3285 0 iege .
SFX 3164 Y 1
SFX 3164 0 iegs .
SFX 882 Y 1
SFX 882 0 kette .
SFX 615 Y 1
SFX 615 0 reihe .
SFX 937 Y 1
SFX 937 0 angelegenheiten .
SFX 1473 Y 1
SFX 1473 0 information .
SFX 3430 Y 1
SFX 3430 0 anwälten .
SFX 4497 Y 1
SFX 4497 0 geistes .
SFX 1335 Y 1
SFX 1335 0 nbereichen .
SFX 1862 Y 1
SFX 1862 0 nbereiches .
SFX 1076 Y 1
SFX 1076 0 kontrollen .
SFX 226 Y 1
SFX 226 0 satzes .
SFX 698 Y 1
SFX 698 0 narten .
SFX 135 Y 1
SFX 135 0 gesetzen .
SFX 93 Y 1
SFX 93 0 gesetzes .
SFX 1585 Y 1
SFX 1585 0 stypen .
SFX 1954 Y 1
SFX 1954 0 perre .
SFX 357 Y 1
SFX 357 0 begriff .
SFX 1469 Y 1
SFX 1469 0 papier .
SFX 1747 Y 1
SFX 1747 0 sinstitut .
SFX 673 Y 1
SFX 673 0 antriebe .
SFX 457 Y 1
SFX 457 0 antriebs .
SFX 2814 Y 1
SFX 2814 0 sverband .
SFX 606 Y 1
SFX 606 0 ausschusses .
SFX 3137 Y 1
SFX 3137 0 raketen .
SFX 803 Y 1
SFX 803 0 nsystem .
SFX 1557 Y 1
SFX 1557 0 puren .
SFX 1374 Y 1
SFX 1374 0 akt .
SFX 4757 Y 1
SFX 4757 0 sformular .
SFX 4750 Y 1
SFX 4750 0 skammern .
SFX 2762 Y 1
SFX 2762 0 sangelegenheiten .
SFX 1769 Y 1
SFX 1769 0 beine .
SFX 3760 Y 1
SFX 3760 0 beins .
SFX 102 Y 1
SFX 102 0 betrieb .
SFX 2691 Y 1
SFX 2691 0 sbefehlen .
SFX 2513 Y 1
SFX 2513 0 sergebnissen .
SFX 2512 Y 1
SFX 2512 0 sergebnisses .
SFX 2522 Y 1
SFX 2522 0 objekte .
SFX 2368 Y 1
SFX 2368 0 chlauch .
SFX 2596 Y 1
SFX 2596 0 ymbole .
SFX 2595 Y 1
SFX 2595 0 ymbols .
SFX 4220 Y 1
SFX 4220 0 anleitung .
SFX 2564 Y 1
SFX 2564 0 lichkeiten .
SFX 4967 Y 1
SFX 4967 0 sbeispielen .
SFX 4769 Y 1
SFX 4769 0 sbeispieles .
SFX 2251 Y 1
SFX 2251 0 portale .
SFX 494 Y 1
SFX 494 0 träger .
SFX 4006 Y 1
SFX 4006 0 albums .
SFX 1381 Y 1
SFX 1381 0 santräge .
SFX 959 Y 1
SFX 959 0 szentrums .
SFX 2447 Y 1
SFX 2447 0 sorgan .
SFX 2509 Y 1
SFX 2509 0 smerkmale .
SFX 2612 Y 1
SFX 2612 0 smerkmals .
SFX 3355 Y 1
SFX 3355 0 sstruktur .
SFX 4650 Y 1
SFX 4650 0 gehältern .
SFX 3856 Y 1
SFX 3856 0 friedhof .
SFX 3984 Y 1
SFX 3984 0 chlitten .
SFX 1278 Y 1
SFX 1278 0 sfaktor .
SFX 3094 Y 1
SFX 3094 0 chirmen .
SFX 1887 Y 1
SFX 1887 0 volumen .
SFX 3424 Y 1
SFX 3424 0 bauwerken .
SFX 2104 Y 1
SFX 2104 0 verträge .
SFX 2118 Y 1
SFX 2118 0 mangels .
SFX 2746 Y 1
SFX 2746 0 treffen .
SFX 2382 Y 1
SFX 2382 0 ure .
SFX 3674 Y 1
SFX 3674 0 urs .
SFX 2503 Y 1
SFX 2503 0 tafel .
SFX 3786 Y 1
SFX 3786 0 tarife .
SFX 3897 Y 1
SFX 3897 0 tarifs .
SFX 3260 Y 1
SFX 3260 0 on .
SFX 1470 Y 1
SFX 1470 0 or .
SFX 4788 Y 1
SFX 4788 0 os .
SFX 572 Y 1
SFX 572 0 station .
SFX 2950 Y 1
SFX 2950 0 technologien .
SFX 4683 Y 1
SFX 4683 0 besucherinnen .
SFX 2998 Y 1
SFX 2998 0 flügel .
SFX 1528 Y 1
SFX 1528 0 flügen .
SFX 19 Y 1
SFX 19 0 est .
SFX 885 Y 1
SFX 885 0 gewächsen .
SFX 884 Y 1
SFX 884 0 gewächses .
SFX 1861 Y 1
SFX 1861 0 ndste .
SFX 1229 Y 1
SFX 1229 0 entwürfen .
SFX 2055 Y 1
SFX 2055 0 beiträgen .
SFX 3427 Y 1
SFX 3427 0 auftritte .
SFX 2616 Y 1
SFX 2616 0 sgebühren .
SFX 3941 Y 1
SFX 3941 0 reifen .
SFX 3632 Y 1
SFX 3632 0 drüse .
SFX 3480 Y 1
SFX 3480 0 sablauf .
SFX 4182 Y 1
SFX 4182 0 indexen .
SFX 3752 Y 1
SFX 3752 0 chwingungen .
SFX 3792 Y 1
SFX 3792 0 studie .
SFX 4141 Y 1
SFX 4141 0 studio .
SFX 1397 Y 1
SFX 1397 0 dosen .
SFX 4262 Y 1
SFX 4262 0 sniveau .
SFX 3334 Y 1
SFX 3334 0 wirkung .
SFX 3607 Y 1
SFX 3607 0 nteilen .
SFX 3709 Y 1
SFX 3709 0 schnitt .
SFX 621 Y 1
SFX 621 0 verbindung .
SFX 1226 Y 1
SFX 1226 0 festival .
SFX 877 Y 1
SFX 877 0 versicherungen .
SFX 2434 Y 1
SFX 2434 0 versuche .
SFX 2677 Y 1
SFX 2677 0 versuchs .
SFX 4688 Y 1
SFX 4688 0 bausteinen .
SFX 3795 Y 1
SFX 3795 0 sschule .
SFX 2882 Y 1
SFX 2882 0 studien .
SFX 4929 Y 1
SFX 4929 0 städten .
SFX 3466 Y 1
SFX 3466 0 sschema .
SFX 3956 Y 1
SFX 3956 0 ministerium .
SFX 4183 Y 1
SFX 4183 0 imulationen .
SFX 2237 Y 1
SFX 2237 0 syndrom .
SFX 4211 Y 1
SFX 4211 0 betreuungen .
SFX 3708 Y 1
SFX 3708 0 seinsatz .
SFX 1571 Y 1
SFX 1571 0 eintrag .
SFX 2644 Y 1
SFX 2644 0 leben .
SFX 645 Y 1
SFX 645 0 bestimmung .
SFX 3031 Y 1
SFX 3031 0 stellern .
SFX 3030 Y 1
SFX 3030 0 stellers .
SFX 3634 Y 1
SFX 3634 0 differenzen .
SFX 619 Y 1
SFX 619 0 aufbaus .
SFX 1117 Y 1
SFX 1117 0 srate .
SFX 2097 Y 1
SFX 2097 0 beteiligung .
SFX 3142 Y 1
SFX 3142 0 nindustrie .
SFX 1947 Y 1
SFX 1947 0 sdatums .
SFX 2015 Y 1
SFX 2015 0 deckel .
SFX 1094 Y 1
SFX 1094 0 decken .
SFX 4568 Y 1
SFX 4568 0 taub .
SFX 1455 Y 1
SFX 1455 0 code .
SFX 1536 Y 1
SFX 1536 0 bremse .
SFX 1287 Y 1
SFX 1287 0 krankheit .
SFX 2769 Y 1
SFX 2769 0 materialien .
SFX 4865 Y 1
SFX 4865 0 beilage .
SFX 2063 Y 1
SFX 2063 0 zuchten .
SFX 2895 Y 1
SFX 2895 0 sabschnitt .
SFX 4926 Y 1
SFX 4926 0 steigen .
SFX 3280 Y 1
SFX 3280 0 kombination .
SFX 598 Y 1
SFX 598 0 tücken .
SFX 3838 Y 1
SFX 3838 0 nanteil .
SFX 854 Y 1
SFX 854 0 gang .
SFX 3804 Y 1
SFX 3804 0 sformel .
SFX 361 Y 1
SFX 361 0 sformen .
SFX 4777 Y 1
SFX 4777 0 röcken .
SFX 3246 Y 1
SFX 3246 0 snachweis .
SFX 2079 Y 1
SFX 2079 0 nende .
SFX 714 Y 1
SFX 714 0 gemeinde .
SFX 4513 Y 1
SFX 4513 0 bunkers .
SFX 2719 Y 1
SFX 2719 0 fabrikation .
SFX 1506 Y 1
SFX 1506 0 bögen .
SFX 1985 Y 1
SFX 1985 0 täbe .
SFX 416 Y 1
SFX 416 0 märkte .
SFX 1004 Y 1
SFX 1004 0 chefs .
SFX 2040 Y 1
SFX 2040 0 regel .
SFX 4304 Y 1
SFX 4304 0 ngesellschaften .
SFX 949 Y 1
SFX 949 0 toffen .
SFX 2319 Y 1
SFX 2319 0 depots .
SFX 996 Y 1
SFX 996 0 sprobleme .
SFX 1045 Y 1
SFX 1045 0 sproblems .
SFX 3577 Y 1
SFX 3577 0 spräsidentin .
SFX 3655 Y 1
SFX 3655 0 ammler .
SFX 2853 Y 1
SFX 2853 0 brettchens .
SFX 2779 Y 1
SFX 2779 0 erfahrung .
SFX 774 Y 1
SFX 774 0 nem .
SFX 20 Y 1
SFX 20 0 nen .
SFX 348 Y 1
SFX 348 0 ner .
SFX 697 Y 1
SFX 697 0 nes .
SFX 3041 Y 1
SFX 3041 0 srichtlinien .
SFX 4388 Y 1
SFX 4388 0 tühlen .
SFX 4648 Y 1
SFX 4648 0 gewichte .
SFX 4099 Y 1
SFX 4099 0 hammer .
SFX 1901 Y 1
SFX 1901 0 sbegriffe .
SFX 1180 Y 1
SFX 1180 0 sbegriffs .
SFX 2459 Y 1
SFX 2459 0 nfeld .
SFX 1007 Y 1
SFX 1007 0 werten .
SFX 2496 Y 1
SFX 2496 0 wertes .
SFX 2227 Y 1
SFX 2227 0 anpassungen .
SFX 863 Y 1
SFX 863 0 toffe .
SFX 878 Y 1
SFX 878 0 toffs .
SFX 3582 Y 1
SFX 3582 0 skreise .
SFX 3926 Y 1
SFX 3926 0 scodes .
SFX 1324 Y 1
SFX 1324 0 zelle .
SFX 3672 Y 1
SFX 3672 0 verschluss .
SFX 2749 Y 1
SFX 2749 0 tatistik .
SFX 2840 Y 1
SFX 2840 0 inhalten .
SFX 740 Y 1
SFX 740 0 beschreibung .
SFX 2143 Y 1
SFX 2143 0 verbot .
SFX 4709 Y 1
SFX 4709 0 wein .
SFX 879 Y 1
SFX 879 0 stage .
SFX 2958 Y 1
SFX 2958 0 stags .
SFX 1376 Y 1
SFX 1376 0 stab .
SFX 785 Y 1
SFX 785 0 stag .
SFX 4522 Y 1
SFX 4522 0 bedürfnis .
SFX 2380 Y 1
SFX 2380 0 verboten .
SFX 3339 Y 1
SFX 3339 0 verbotes .
SFX 3225 Y 1
SFX 3225 0 tempel .
SFX 2832 Y 1
SFX 2832 0 ngeschäft .
SFX 2138 Y 1
SFX 2138 0 altar .
SFX 4531 Y 1
SFX 4531 0 ale .
SFX 3106 Y 1
SFX 3106 0 als .
SFX 2863 Y 1
SFX 2863 0 alz .
SFX 3299 Y 1
SFX 3299 0 ermittlungen .
SFX 3735 Y 1
SFX 3735 0 gestalten .
SFX 2083 Y 1
SFX 2083 0 kapazität .
SFX 2910 Y 1
SFX 2910 0 inhaber .
SFX 2211 Y 1
SFX 2211 0 hund .
SFX 1723 Y 1
SFX 1723 0 quote .
SFX 170 Y 1
SFX 170 0 bildung .
SFX 4974 Y 1
SFX 4974 0 riss .
SFX 1307 Y 1
SFX 1307 0 sanspruchs .
SFX 701 Y 1
SFX 701 0 darstellungen .
SFX 2703 Y 1
SFX 2703 0 nwerke .
SFX 2702 Y 1
SFX 2702 0 nwerks .
SFX 3061 Y 1
SFX 3061 0 regiment .
SFX 3928 Y 1
SFX 3928 0 schreiber .
SFX 2887 Y 1
SFX 2887 0 skräfte .
SFX 4021 Y 1
SFX 4021 0 vergiftung .
SFX 3548 Y 1
SFX 3548 0 abfällen .
SFX 3673 Y 1
SFX 3673 0 verkaufes .
SFX 1570 Y 1
SFX 1570 0 entwurfs .
SFX 4407 Y 1
SFX 4407 0 sverkehrs .
SFX 3790 Y 1
SFX 3790 0 swerkzeuge .
SFX 3789 Y 1
SFX 3789 0 swerkzeugs .
SFX 1548 Y 1
SFX 1548 0 stests .
SFX 2408 Y 1
SFX 2408 0 händler .
SFX 4127 Y 1
SFX 4127 0 verschlusses .
SFX 3206 Y 1
SFX 3206 0 anierung .
SFX 1685 Y 1
SFX 1685 0 abzeichen .
SFX 723 Y 1
SFX 723 0 angriffe .
SFX 741 Y 1
SFX 741 0 angriffs .
SFX 2357 Y 1
SFX 2357 0 königen .
SFX 2908 Y 1
SFX 2908 0 lokomotiven .
SFX 4991 Y 1
SFX 4991 0 organe .
SFX 4789 Y 1
SFX 4789 0 organs .
SFX 4454 Y 1
SFX 4454 0 ndruck .
SFX 4248 Y 1
SFX 4248 0 stimme .
SFX 1641 Y 1
SFX 1641 0 katalog .
SFX 4430 Y 1
SFX 4430 0 sbedürfnisses .
SFX 1472 Y 1
SFX 1472 0 laden .
SFX 1312 Y 1
SFX 1312 0 ignalen .
SFX 2260 Y 1
SFX 2260 0 laufs .
SFX 2226 Y 1
SFX 2226 0 beginns .
SFX 166 Y 1
SFX 166 0 sverfahrens .
SFX 4008 Y 1
SFX 4008 0 abwicklung .
SFX 3618 Y 1
SFX 3618 0 kolonie .
SFX 2048 Y 1
SFX 2048 0 etz .
SFX 4204 Y 1
SFX 4204 0 chuppen .
SFX 563 Y 1
SFX 563 0 sdienste .
SFX 3915 Y 1
SFX 3915 0 siegen .
SFX 4267 Y 1
SFX 4267 0 sieger .
SFX 4424 Y 1
SFX 4424 0 sieges .
SFX 2728 Y 1
SFX 2728 0 chächte .
SFX 549 Y 1
SFX 549 0 klassen .
SFX 1134 Y 1
SFX 1134 0 stheorie .
SFX 869 Y 1
SFX 869 0 konstruktion .
SFX 1851 Y 1
SFX 1851 0 slehren .
SFX 4277 Y 1
SFX 4277 0 schrauben .
SFX 289 Y 1
SFX 289 0 geräten .
SFX 3737 Y 1
SFX 3737 0 gerätes .
SFX 2792 Y 1
SFX 2792 0 auszug .
SFX 438 Y 1
SFX 438 0 entwicklung .
SFX 2199 Y 1
SFX 2199 0 sbeschlüssen .
SFX 3450 Y 1
SFX 3450 0 tudios .
SFX 1825 Y 1
SFX 1825 0 fotos .
SFX 3351 Y 1
SFX 3351 0 strategie .
SFX 2674 Y 1
SFX 2674 0 abweichung .
SFX 327 Y 1
SFX 327 0 beständen .
SFX 826 Y 1
SFX 826 0 banken .
SFX 1799 Y 1
SFX 1799 0 chlösser .
SFX 2921 Y 1
SFX 2921 0 erfolg .
SFX 1646 Y 1
SFX 1646 0 fähigkeit .
SFX 649 Y 1
SFX 649 0 meister .
SFX 2983 Y 1
SFX 2983 0 kinder .
SFX 4637 Y 1
SFX 4637 0 kindes .
SFX 2120 Y 1
SFX 2120 0 kommando .
SFX 938 Y 1
SFX 938 0 abschluss .
SFX 3879 Y 1
SFX 3879 0 anfanges .
SFX 3620 Y 1
SFX 3620 0 klappe .
SFX 2001 Y 1
SFX 2001 0 pielerin .
SFX 4878 Y 1
SFX 4878 0 ansteuerung .
SFX 1171 Y 1
SFX 1171 0 dach .
SFX 4620 Y 1
SFX 4620 0 nbandes .
SFX 3510 Y 1
SFX 3510 0 handwerks .
SFX 837 Y 1
SFX 837 0 gelände .
SFX 1942 Y 1
SFX 1942 0 sstufen .
SFX 3264 Y 1
SFX 3264 0 nehmern .
SFX 3610 Y 1
SFX 3610 0 nehmers .
SFX 1147 Y 1
SFX 1147 0 bezirke .
SFX 1080 Y 1
SFX 1080 0 bezirks .
SFX 4844 Y 1
SFX 4844 0 extrakt .
SFX 3653 Y 1
SFX 3653 0 ansammlungen .
SFX 27 Y 1
SFX 27 0 innen .
SFX 919 Y 1
SFX 919 0 sraum .
SFX 1046 Y 1
SFX 1046 0 splanes .
SFX 2098 Y 1
SFX 2098 0 beamtin .
SFX 1766 Y 1
SFX 1766 0 berufen .
SFX 653 Y 1
SFX 653 0 sgrad .
SFX 961 Y 1
SFX 961 0 strukturen .
SFX 1544 Y 1
SFX 1544 0 züge .
SFX 3841 Y 1
SFX 3841 0 lohn .
SFX 2495 Y 1
SFX 2495 0 ablagerungen .
SFX 4360 Y 1
SFX 4360 0 angestellten .
SFX 4695 Y 1
SFX 4695 0 angestellter .
SFX 4905 Y 1
SFX 4905 0 übungen .
SFX 3590 Y 1
SFX 3590 0 sflugzeugen .
SFX 4536 Y 1
SFX 4536 0 zwecken .
SFX 2208 Y 1
SFX 2208 0 kasten .
SFX 2218 Y 1
SFX 2218 0 etzen .
SFX 1970 Y 1
SFX 1970 0 etzes .
SFX 4076 Y 1
SFX 4076 0 pilotin .
SFX 377 Y 1
SFX 377 0 zeug .
SFX 3304 Y 1
SFX 3304 0 eile .
SFX 970 Y 1
SFX 970 0 decke .
SFX 4724 Y 1
SFX 4724 0 trainerin .
SFX 4115 Y 1
SFX 4115 0 begleitung .
SFX 4786 Y 1
SFX 4786 0 packungen .
SFX 121 Y 1
SFX 121 0 bücher .
SFX 2127 Y 1
SFX 2127 0 gebühr .
SFX 3193 Y 1
SFX 3193 0 beauftragten .
SFX 3192 Y 1
SFX 3192 0 beauftragter .
SFX 868 Y 1
SFX 868 0 nbau .
SFX 2971 Y 1
SFX 2971 0 rädern .
